Missouri, session 2026, SB852.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 375.918, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 375.918,
to read as follows:
375.918. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Adverse action", a denial, nonrenewal of, or a
reduction in the amount of benefits payable or types of
coverages under any contract, existing or applied for, in
connection with the underwriting of insurance. An offer by
an insurer to write a contract through an affiliated insurer
does not constitute an adverse action;
(2) "Contract", any automobile insurance policy as
defined in section 379.110, or any property insurance policy
as defined in section 375.001, including such a policy on a
mobile home or residential condominium unit or a policy of
renters' or tenants' insurance. Contract shall not include
any policy of mortgage insurance or commercial insurance;
(3) "Credit report", any written or electronic
communication of any information by a consumer reporting
agency that:

SB 852 2
(a) Bears on a person's credit worthiness, credit
standing, or credit capacity; and
(b) Is used or collected wholly or partly to serve as
a factor in the underwriting of a contract;
(4) "Credit scoring entity", any entity that is
involved in creating, compiling, or providing insurance
credit scores;
(5) "Insurance credit score", a numerical
representation of the insurance risk a person presents using
the person's attributes derived from a credit report or
credit information in a formula to assess insurance risk on
an actuarial or statistical basis;
(6) "Insurer", any insurance company or entity that
offers a contract;
(7) "Underwriting", the selection of the risk that
will be assumed by the insurer on a contract, and
specifically the decision whether to accept, deny, renew,
nonrenew, reduce, or increase the amount of benefits payable
or types of coverages under the contract.
2. An insurer using a credit report or insurance
credit score as a factor in underwriting shall not take an
adverse action based on such factor without consideration of
another noncredit-related underwriting factor.
3. No insurer shall take an adverse action against an
applicant or insured based on inability to compute an
insurance credit score without consideration of another
underwriting factor, unless the insurer can justify the
credibility that the lack of an insurance credit score has
in underwriting to the director of the department of
commerce and insurance.
4. An insurer using a credit report or insurance
credit score as a factor in underwriting a contract shall

SB 852 3
disclose at the time of the original application for the
contract or on the application itself that the insurer may
gather credit information.
5. An insurer using a credit report or insurance
credit score as a factor in underwriting of a contract shall
not take an adverse action on such contract based on
information that is the subject of a written dispute between
the policyholder or applicant and a consumer reporting
agency, as noted in such person's credit report, until such
dispute has reached final determination in accordance with
the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section
1681, et seq. In the event that information is the subject
of a written dispute under this subsection, the sixty-day
period provided by section 375.002 or section 379.110 shall
be extended until fifteen days after the dispute reaches
final determination. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to require any consumer reporting agency, as
defined by the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C.
Section 1681, et seq., to include any information on a
credit report beyond the extent required by the federal Fair
Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681, et seq.
6. If the use of a credit report or insurance credit
score on a contract results in an adverse action, the
insurer shall provide the policyholder or applicant:
(1) Notice that a credit report or insurance credit
score adversely affected the underwriting of the contract;
(2) The name, address, and telephone number of the
consumer credit reporting agency that furnished the credit
information, in compliance with the notice requirements of
the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section
1681, et seq.;

SB 852 4
(3) Notice of the right to obtain a free credit report
from the consumer credit reporting agency within sixty days;
and
(4) Notice of the right to lodge a dispute with the
consumer credit reporting agency to have any erroneous
information corrected in accordance with the federal Fair
Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681, et seq.
7. Within thirty days from the date the insurer
provides notice of an adverse action pursuant to subdivision
(1) of subsection 6 of this section, the applicant or
insured may in writing request from the insurer a statement
of reasons for such action. For purposes of determining the
thirty-day period, the notice of an adverse action is deemed
received three days after mailing. The statement of reasons
shall be sufficiently clear and specific so that a person of
average intelligence can identify the basis for the
insurer's decision without further inquiry. An insurer may
provide an explanation of significant characteristics of the
credit history that may have impacted such person's
100 insurance credit score to meet the requirements of this
101 subsection. Standardized credit explanations provided by
102 credit scoring entities comply with this subsection.
103 8. If an insurer bases an adverse action in part on a
104 credit report or insurance credit score, the applicant or
105 insured may within thirty days of such adverse action make a
106 written request for reunderwriting following any correction
107 relating to the credit report or insurance credit score.
108 9. An insurer may obtain and use a current credit
109 report or insurance credit score on new business or renewal
110 contracts, but shall not take an adverse action with respect
111 to renewal contracts based upon such credit report or

SB 852 5
112 insurance credit score until or after the third anniversary
113 date of the initial contract.
114 10. Insurance inquiries shall not directly or
115 indirectly be used as a negative factor in any insurance
116 credit scoring formula or in the use of a credit report in
117 underwriting.
118 11. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
119 superceding the provisions of section 375.002 and section
120 379.114. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
121 prohibiting any insurer from using credit information in
122 determining whether to offer a policyholder or applicant the
123 option to finance or establish a payment plan for the
124 payment of any premium for a contract. Nothing in this
125 section shall apply to any entity not acting as an insurer
126 or credit scoring entity as defined in subsection 1 of this
127 section.
128 12. No credit scoring entity shall provide or sell to
129 any party, other than the insurer, its insurance company
130 affiliates or holding companies, and the producer from whom
131 the inquiry was generated, data or lists that include any
132 information that in whole or in part is submitted in
133 conjunction with credit inquiries about consumers. Such
134 information includes, but is not limited to, expiration
135 dates, information that may identify time periods during
136 which a consumer's insurance may expire, or other nonpublic
137 personal information as defined under the Gramm-Leach-Bliley
138 Act, 15 U.S.C. Sections 6801 to 6809. The provisions of
139 this subsection shall not preclude the exchange of
140 information specifically authorized under the federal Fair
141 Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681, et seq., the
142 Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. Sections 6801 to 6809 and
143 other applicable federal law. The provisions of this

SB 852 6
144 subsection shall not apply to data disclosed in connection
145 with a proposed or actual sale, merger, transfer or exchange
146 of all or a portion of an insurer's or producer's business
147 or operating unit, including but not limited to, the sale of
148 a portfolio of contracts, if such disclosure concerns solely
149 consumers of the business or unit and such disclosure is not
150 the primary reason for the sale, merger, transfer or
151 exchange.
152 13. A violation of this section may be enforceable
153 under section 374.280.
154 14. The provisions of this section shall apply to all
155 contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2003.
156 15. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
157 contrary, for any contract that is an automobile insurance
158 policy as defined in section 379.110 that is entered into on
159 or after August 28, 2026, no insurer shall utilize any
160 information obtained directly or indirectly from a consumer
161 reporting agency or any insurance credit score that relies
162 on information obtained directly or indirectly from a
163 consumer reporting agency for the purpose of determining the
164 rate charged for such contract.
✓